Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-809
Lien; labor preferred over material.

All liens affixed by virtue of the provisions of sections 57-801 to 57-820 upon the same property shall be of equal standing except that liens of persons for the performance of labor shall be preferred to all other liens affixed by virtue of sections 57-801 to 57-820.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 9, p. 811.